Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202013-2003
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, the definitions found in sections 13-2004 to 13-2016.01 shall be used.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1207, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB632, § 3.